Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1059.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Pennsylvania Support Through Loss Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Assisted reproductive technology procedure." The term shall have the meaning given to "assisted reproductive technology" under 42 U.S.C. § 263a-7 (relating to definitions), as defined on the effective date of this definition."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Domestic partner." With respect to an unmarried employee, 123456789101112131415161718 includes:(1) the person recognized as the domestic partner of the employee under a domestic partnership or civil union law of a state or political subdivision of a state; and(2) an unmarried, adult person who is in a committed, personal relationship with the employee, who is not a domestic partner as described in paragraph (1) or in a relationship with any other person and who is designated to the employee's employer by the employee as that employee's domestic partner."Employer." A person engaged in commerce or in an industry or activity affecting commerce who employs five or more employees for each working day during each calendar workweek or more in the current or preceding year."Paid leave time." An increment of compensated leave that can be granted to an employee for use during an absence from employment for any reason described in this act."Secretary." The Secretary of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Unpaid leave time." Leave granted and used in the same manner and under the same conditions as paid leave time for the purposes of this act, except that no compensation shall be paid.Section 3. Paid leave time.(a) Grant of paid leave.--An employer shall grant to each employee employed by the employer 24 hours of paid leave time on the employee's first workday of each calendar year for use as needed during that calendar year for reasons described in subsection (d).(b) No carryover.--Paid leave time granted under this section shall not carry over from one year to the next.20250SB1059PN1244 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Paid leave policy.--An employer with a paid leave policy who makes available an amount of paid leave that is sufficient to meet the requirements of this section and that is made available for all stated reasons and under all stated conditions that are the same as the reasons and conditions under subsection (d) shall not be required to grant an employee additional paid leave time under this section.(d) Reason for leave.--Paid leave time granted under this section may be used by an employee for either:(1) An absence resulting from:(i) a pregnancy loss;(ii) an unsuccessful round of intrauterine insemination or an unsuccessful round of an assisted reproductive technology procedure;(iii) a failed adoption match or an adoption that is not finalized because it is contested by another party;(iv) a failed surrogacy arrangement; or(v) a diagnosis or event that impacts pregnancy or fertility.(2) An absence to care for a spouse or domestic partner who experiences a circumstance described under paragraph (1).Section 4. Prohibited acts.It shall be unlawful for an employer to interfere with, restrain or deny the exercise of or the attempt to exercise a right provided under this act, including:(1) discharging or discriminating against, including retaliating against, an individual, including a job applicant, for exercising or attempting to exercise a right provided under this act;(2) using the taking of paid leave time or unpaid leave 20250SB1059PN1244 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 time under this act as a factor in an employment action, such as hiring, promotion, reducing hours or number of shifts or a disciplinary action; or(3) counting the paid leave time or unpaid leave time under a no-fault attendance policy or any other absence control policy.Section 5. Notice requirement.(a) Notice.--Within 60 days of the effective date of this subsection, an employer shall notify each employee of the information described in paragraphs (1), (2) and (3). Each employer shall post and keep posted a notice, to be prepared or approved in accordance with regulations prescribed under this act, stating excerpts from, or summaries of, the pertinent provisions of this act, including:(1) information describing paid leave time available to employees under this act;(2) information pertaining to the filing of an action under this act; and(3) information that describes:(i) the protections that an employee has in exercising rights under this act; and(ii) how the employee can contact the department if any of the rights are violated.(b) Location.--The notice described under subsection (a) shall be posted:(1) in conspicuous places on the premises of the employer, where notices to employees, including applicants, are customarily posted; or(2) in an employee handbook.(c) Penalty.--An employer who willfully violates this 20250SB1059PN1244 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section shall be subject to a civil fine in an amount not to exceed $100 for each separate violation.Section 6. Civil action by employees or individuals.(a) Right of action.--An action to recover the damages or equitable relief prescribed may be maintained against an employer in a court of competent jurisdiction by one or more employees or individuals or a representative for, and on behalf of:(1) the employees or individuals; or(2) the employees or individuals and others similarly situated.(b) Liability.--An employer who violates section 4 shall be liable to an employee or individual affected:(1) for damages equal to:(i) the amount of:(A) wages, salary, employment benefits or other compensation denied or lost by reason of the violation; or(B) if wages, salary, employment benefits or other compensation have not been denied or lost, any actual monetary losses sustained as a direct result of the violation up to a sum equal to 24 hours of wages or salary for the employee or individual;(ii) the interest on the amount described in subparagraph (i) calculated at the prevailing rate; and(iii) an additional amount as liquidated damages; and(2) for equitable relief as may be appropriate, including employment, reinstatement and promotion.(c) Fees and costs.--The court, in an action under this 20250SB1059PN1244 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section, shall, in addition to any judgment awarded to the plaintiff, allow reasonable attorney fees, reasonable expert witness fees and other costs of the action to be paid by the defendant.Section 7. Administrative action.(a) Duty of secretary.--The secretary shall receive, investigate and attempt to resolve complaints of violations of section 4, including a violation relating to the rights provided under this act.(b) Penalty.--The secretary may levy an administrative penalty of up to $5,000 per violation.Section 8. Civil action by department.The secretary may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover the damages described under this act. The following apply:(1) Money recovered by the secretary under section 6 shall be held in a special deposit account and shall be paid, on order of the secretary, directly to each employee or individual affected. The money not paid to an employee or individual affected because of the inability to do so within a period of three years shall be deposited into the General Fund.(2) An action may be brought no later than two years after the date of the last event constituting the alleged violation for which the action is brought.(3) In the case of an action brought for a willful violation of section 4, the action may be brought within three years of the date of the last event constituting the alleged violation for which the action is brought.(4) In determining when an action is commenced under 20250SB1059PN1244 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this section, an action shall be considered to be commenced on the date when the complaint is filed.Section 9. Regulations.The department may promulgate regulations to administer and enforce this act.Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1059PN1244 - 7 - 1234567